Utah statutes.
53-3-806.5.   Identification card required if sex offender does not have driver license.

(1) (a)  If a person is required to register as a sex offender in accordance with Title 77, Chapter 41, Sex and Kidnap Offender Registry, and the person does not hold a current driver license in compliance with Section 53-3-205, the person shall obtain an identification card.

(b)  The person shall maintain a current identification card during any time the person is required to register as a sex offender and the person does not hold a valid driver license.

(2)  Failure to maintain a current identification card as required under Subsection (1) on and after April 30, 2007 is a class A misdemeanor for each month of violation of Subsection (1).

